Utah statutes.
53A-1a-519.   Charter school students' participation in extracurricular
activities at other public schools.
(1)  A charter school student is eligible to participate in extracurricular
activities not offered by the student's charter school at:
(a)  the school within whose attendance boundaries the student's custodial
parent or legal guardian resides; or
(b)  the public school from which the student withdrew for the purpose of
attending a charter school.
(2)  A school other than a school described in Subsection (1)(a) or (b) may
allow a charter school student to participate in extracurricular activities
other than:
(a)  interschool competitions of athletic teams sponsored and supported by a
public school; or
(b)  interschool contests or competitions for music, drama, or forensic groups
or teams sponsored and supported by a public school.
(3)  A charter school student is eligible for extracurricular activities at a
public school consistent with eligibility standards as applied to full-time
students of the public school.
(4)  A school district or public school may not impose additional requirements
on a charter school student to participate in extracurricular activities that
are not imposed on full-time students of the public school.
(5) (a)  The State Board of Education shall make rules establishing fees for
charter school students' participation in extracurricular activities at school
district schools.
(b)  The rules shall provide that:
(i)  charter school students pay the same fees as other students to
participate in extracurricular activities;
(ii)  charter school students are eligible for fee waivers pursuant to Section
53A-12-103;
(iii)  for each charter school student who participates in an extracurricular
activity at a school district school, the charter school shall pay a share of
the school district's costs for the extracurricular activity; and
(iv)  a charter school's share of the costs of an extracurricular activity
shall reflect state and local tax revenues expended, except capital facilities
expenditures, for an extracurricular activity in a school district or school
divided by total student enrollment of the school district or school.
(c)  In determining a charter school's share of the costs of an
extracurricular activity under Subsections (5)(b)(iii) and (iv), the State
Board of Education may establish uniform fees statewide based on average costs
statewide or average costs within a sample of school districts.       (6)
When selection to participate in an extracurricular activity at a public
school is made on a competitive basis, a charter school student is eligible to
try out for and participate in the activity as provided in this section.
